District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.104

Rejection of measure.

If a majority of the registered qualified electors voting on a referred act vote to disapprove the act, such action shall be deemed a rejection of the act or that portion of the act on the referendum ballot and no action may be taken by the Council of the District of Columbia with regard to the matter presented at referendum for the 365 days following the date of the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics’ certification of the vote concerning the referendum.

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
1981 Ed., § 1-284.
1973 Ed., § 1-184.
Rejection of Initiative on Mandatory Life Imprisonment or Death Penalty for Murder in the District of Columbia: Section 138 of Pub. L. 102-382, 106 Stat. 1436, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1993, provided an initiative measure which would have increased the penalty for first-degree murder in the District of Columbia to a sentence of death or life imprisonment without the possibility of parole; the initiative was rejected at the general election held on November 3, 1992.